Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.120

Nonintervention powers not deemed waived by obtaining order or decree.

A personal representative who has acquired nonintervention powers in accordance with this chapter may present a matter, as defined in RCW 11.96A.030, to the court for resolution or for instructions under chapter 11.96A RCW at any time. A personal representative shall not be deemed to have waived the personal representative's nonintervention powers by seeking or obtaining any order or decree during the course of the administration of the estate.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4017; 2010 c 8 s 2059; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 24.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.